Illinois, session 104th, SB1811.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Public Labor Relations Act is 5amended by changing Sections 11 and 14 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 315/11)  (from Ch. 48, par. 1611)7    Sec. 11. Unfair labor practice procedures. Unfair labor 8practices may be dealt with by the Board in the following 9manner:10    (a) Whenever it is charged that any person has engaged in 11or is engaging in any unfair labor practice, the Board or any 12agent designated by the Board for such purposes, shall conduct 13an investigation of the charge. If after such investigation 14the Board finds that the charge involves a dispositive issue 15of law or fact the Board shall issue a complaint and cause to 16be served upon the person a complaint stating the charges, 17accompanied by a notice of hearing before the Board or a member 18thereof designated by the Board, or before a qualified hearing 19officer designated by the Board at the offices of the Board or 20such other location as the Board deems appropriate, not less 21than 5 days after serving of such complaint provided that no 22complaint shall issue based upon any unfair labor practice 23occurring more than six months prior to the filing of a charge   SB1811- 2 -LRB104 07505 BDA 17549 b1with the Board and the service of a copy thereof upon the 2person against whom the charge is made, unless the person 3aggrieved thereby did not reasonably have knowledge of the 4alleged unfair labor practice or was prevented from filing 5such a charge by reason of service in the armed forces, in 6which event the six month period shall be computed from the 7date of his discharge. Any such complaint may be amended by the 8member or hearing officer conducting the hearing for the Board 9in his discretion at any time prior to the issuance of an order 10based thereon. The person who is the subject of the complaint 11has the right to file an answer to the original or amended 12complaint and to appear in person or by a representative and 13give testimony at the place and time fixed in the complaint. In 14the discretion of the member or hearing officer conducting the 15hearing or the Board, any other person may be allowed to 16intervene in the proceeding and to present testimony. In any 17hearing conducted by the Board, neither the Board nor the 18member or agent conducting the hearing shall be bound by the 19rules of evidence applicable to courts, except as to the rules 20of privilege recognized by law.21    (b) The Board shall have the power to issue subpoenas and 22administer oaths. If any party wilfully fails or neglects to 23appear or testify or to produce books, papers and records 24pursuant to the issuance of a subpoena by the Board, the Board 25may apply to a court of competent jurisdiction to request that 26such party be ordered to appear before the Board to testify or   SB1811- 3 -LRB104 07505 BDA 17549 b1produce the requested evidence.2    (c) Any testimony taken by the Board, or a member 3designated by the Board or a hearing officer thereof, must be 4reduced to writing and filed with the Board. A full and 5complete record shall be kept of all proceedings before the 6Board, and all proceedings shall be transcribed by a reporter 7appointed by the Board. The party on whom the burden of proof 8rests shall be required to sustain such burden by a 9preponderance of the evidence. If, upon a preponderance of the 10evidence taken, the Board is of the opinion that any person 11named in the charge has engaged in or is engaging in an unfair 12labor practice, then it shall state its findings of fact and 13shall issue and cause to be served upon the person an order 14requiring him to cease and desist from the unfair labor 15practice, and to take such affirmative action, including 16reinstatement of public employees with or without back pay, as 17will effectuate the policies of this Act. If the Board awards 18back pay, it shall also award interest at the rate of 7% per 19annum. The Board's order may further require the person to 20make reports from time to time, and demonstrate the extent to 21which he has complied with the order. If there is no 22preponderance of evidence to indicate to the Board that the 23person named in the charge has engaged in or is engaging in the 24unfair labor practice, then the Board shall state its findings 25of fact and shall issue an order dismissing the complaint. The 26Board's order may in its discretion also include an   SB1811- 4 -LRB104 07505 BDA 17549 b1appropriate sanction, based on the Board's rules and 2regulations, and the sanction may include an order to pay the 3other party or parties' reasonable expenses including costs 4and reasonable attorney's fee, if the other party has made 5allegations or denials without reasonable cause and found to 6be untrue or has engaged in frivolous litigation for the 7purpose of delay or needless increase in the cost of 8litigation; the State of Illinois or any agency thereof shall 9be subject to the provisions of this sentence in the same 10manner as any other party. The Board shall determine whether a 11violation of paragraph (4) of subsection (a) of Section 10 was 12of a serious enough nature that it may have frustrated the 13purposes of this Act by undermining or significantly impacting 14the collective bargaining process such that other traditional 15remedies may not remedy the violation if the Board is unable to 16order a make-whole remedy. Reasons for such a determination 17include the passage of time, that the violation was of a nature 18that could undermine support for a labor organization, or that 19the violation may otherwise undermine the labor organization's 20bargaining strength. If the Board makes a determination that 21the violation frustrated the purposes of this Act, the Board 22shall include the availability of interest arbitration in its 23order and, upon request of the charging party, the parties 24must participate in the impasse arbitration procedures set 25forth in Section 14, except that: (i) the right to strike shall 26not be considered waived pursuant to Section 17 until the   SB1811- 5 -LRB104 07505 BDA 17549 b1actual convening of the arbitration hearing and (ii) the 2commencement of a new fiscal year shall not be deemed to impair 3the jurisdiction or authority of the arbitration panel or its 4decision. The parties continue to have a duty to engage in good 5faith bargaining during the pendency of impasse arbitration 6procedures. 7    (d) Until the record in a case has been filed in court, the 8Board at any time, upon reasonable notice and in such manner as 9it deems proper, may modify or set aside, in whole or in part, 10any finding or order made or issued by it.11    (e) A charging party or any person aggrieved by a final 12order of the Board granting or denying in whole or in part the 13relief sought may apply for and obtain judicial review of an 14order of the Board entered under this Act, in accordance with 15the provisions of the Administrative Review Law, as now or 16hereafter amended, except that such judicial review shall be 17afforded directly in the appellate court for the district in 18which the aggrieved party resides or transacts business, and 19provided, that such judicial review shall not be available for 20the purpose of challenging a final order issued by the Board 21pursuant to Section 9 of this Act for which judicial review has 22been petitioned pursuant to subsection (i) of Section 9. Any 23direct appeal to the Appellate Court shall be filed within 35 24days from the date that a copy of the decision sought to be 25reviewed was served upon the party affected by the decision. 26The filing of such an appeal to the Appellate Court shall not   SB1811- 6 -LRB104 07505 BDA 17549 b1automatically stay the enforcement of the Board's order. An 2aggrieved party may apply to the Appellate Court for a stay of 3the enforcement of the Board's order after the aggrieved party 4has followed the procedure prescribed by Supreme Court Rule 5335. The Board in proceedings under this Section may obtain an 6order of the court for the enforcement of its order.7    (f) Whenever it appears that any person has violated a 8final order of the Board issued pursuant to this Section, the 9Board must commence an action in the name of the People of the 10State of Illinois by petition, alleging the violation, 11attaching a copy of the order of the Board, and praying for the 12issuance of an order directing the person, his officers, 13agents, servants, successors, and assigns to comply with the 14order of the Board. The Board shall be represented in this 15action by the Attorney General in accordance with the Attorney 16General Act. The court may grant or refuse, in whole or in 17part, the relief sought, provided that the court may stay an 18order of the Board in accordance with the Administrative 19Review Law, pending disposition of the proceedings. The court 20may punish a violation of its order as in civil contempt.21    (g) The proceedings provided in paragraph (f) of this 22Section shall be commenced in the Appellate Court for the 23district where the unfair labor practice which is the subject 24of the Board's order was committed, or where a person required 25to cease and desist by such order resides or transacts 26business.  SB1811- 7 -LRB104 07505 BDA 17549 b1    (h) The Board through the Attorney General, shall have 2power, upon issuance of an unfair labor practice complaint 3alleging that a person has engaged in or is engaging in an 4unfair labor practice, to petition the circuit court where the 5alleged unfair labor practice which is the subject of the 6Board's complaint was allegedly committed, or where a person 7required to cease and desist from such alleged unfair labor 8practice resides or transacts business, for appropriate 9temporary relief or restraining order. Upon the filing of any 10such petition, the court shall cause notice thereof to be 11served upon such persons, and thereupon shall have 12jurisdiction to grant to the Board such temporary relief or 13restraining order as it deems just and proper.14    (i) If an unfair labor practice charge involves the 15interpretation or application of a collective bargaining 16agreement and said agreement contains a grievance procedure 17with binding arbitration as its terminal step, the Board may 18defer the resolution of such dispute to the grievance and 19arbitration procedure contained in said agreement.20    (j) To effectuate this Act's policy, the Board shall adopt 21goals (i) to ensure effective enforcement of this Act through 22timely and quality consideration and resolution of unfair 23labor practices with appropriate remedies and (ii) to protect 24employee free choice with timely and effective mechanisms to 25resolve questions concerning representation. To measure and 26report on its success in achieving these goals, the Board   SB1811- 8 -LRB104 07505 BDA 17549 b1shall also adopt the following timeliness goals for the 2processing of unfair labor practice charges filed under 3Section 10:4        (1) Complete the investigation and issue a complaint, 5    dismissal, or deferral within 100 days of the charges 6    being filed. If the dismissal or deferral is appealed to 7    the Board, issue Board decisions within 90 days of the 8    completion of the Board's process for filing appeals. 9        (2) Upon the issuance of complaints for hearing: (i) 10    schedule hearings to begin within 60 days of a complaint's 11    issuance; (ii) issue recommended decisions and orders 12    within 120 days of the close of the record; and (iii) if 13    exceptions to recommended decisions and orders are filed, 14    issue Board decisions within 90 days of the completion of 15    the Board's process for filing exceptions. 16(Source: P.A. 103-856, eff. 1-1-25.) 17    (5 ILCS 315/14)  (from Ch. 48, par. 1614)18    Sec. 14. Security employee, peace officer and fire fighter 19disputes. 20    (a) In the case of collective bargaining agreements 21involving units of security employees of a public employer, 22Peace Officer Units, or units of fire fighters or paramedics, 23and in the case of disputes under Sections 11 and Section 18, 24unless the parties mutually agree to some other time limit, 25mediation shall commence 30 days prior to the expiration date   SB1811- 9 -LRB104 07505 BDA 17549 b1of such agreement or at such later time as the mediation 2services chosen under subsection (b) of Section 12 can be 3provided to the parties. In the case of negotiations for an 4initial collective bargaining agreement, mediation shall 5commence upon 15 days notice from either party or at such later 6time as the mediation services chosen pursuant to subsection 7(b) of Section 12 can be provided to the parties. In mediation 8under this Section, if either party requests the use of 9mediation services from the Federal Mediation and Conciliation 10Service, the other party shall either join in such request or 11bear the additional cost of mediation services from another 12source. The mediator shall have a duty to keep the Board 13informed on the progress of the mediation. If any dispute has 14not been resolved within 15 days after the first meeting of the 15parties and the mediator, or within such other time limit as 16may be mutually agreed upon by the parties, either the 17exclusive representative or employer may request of the other, 18in writing, arbitration, and shall submit a copy of the 19request to the Board.20    (b) Within 10 days after such a request for arbitration 21has been made, the employer shall choose a delegate and the 22employees' exclusive representative shall choose a delegate to 23a panel of arbitration as provided in this Section. The 24employer and employees shall forthwith advise the other and 25the Board of their selections.26    (c) Within 7 days after the request of either party, the   SB1811- 10 -LRB104 07505 BDA 17549 b1parties shall request a panel of impartial arbitrators from 2which they shall select the neutral chairman according to the 3procedures provided in this Section. If the parties have 4agreed to a contract that contains a grievance resolution 5procedure as provided in Section 8, the chairman shall be 6selected using their agreed contract procedure unless they 7mutually agree to another procedure. If the parties fail to 8notify the Board of their selection of neutral chairman within 97 days after receipt of the list of impartial arbitrators, the 10Board shall appoint, at random, a neutral chairman from the 11list. In the absence of an agreed contract procedure for 12selecting an impartial arbitrator, either party may request a 13panel from the Board. Within 7 days of the request of either 14party, the Board shall select from the Public Employees Labor 15Mediation Roster 7 persons who are on the labor arbitration 16panels of either the American Arbitration Association or the 17Federal Mediation and Conciliation Service, or who are members 18of the National Academy of Arbitrators, as nominees for 19impartial arbitrator of the arbitration panel. The parties may 20select an individual on the list provided by the Board or any 21other individual mutually agreed upon by the parties. Within 7 22days following the receipt of the list, the parties shall 23notify the Board of the person they have selected. Unless the 24parties agree on an alternate selection procedure, they shall 25alternatively strike one name from the list provided by the 26Board until only one name remains. A coin toss shall determine   SB1811- 11 -LRB104 07505 BDA 17549 b1which party shall strike the first name. If the parties fail to 2notify the Board in a timely manner of their selection for 3neutral chairman, the Board shall appoint a neutral chairman 4from the Illinois Public Employees Mediation/Arbitration 5Roster.6    (d) The chairman shall call a hearing to begin within 15 7days and give reasonable notice of the time and place of the 8hearing. The hearing shall be held at the offices of the Board 9or at such other location as the Board deems appropriate. The 10chairman shall preside over the hearing and shall take 11testimony. Any oral or documentary evidence and other data 12deemed relevant by the arbitration panel may be received in 13evidence. The proceedings shall be informal. Technical rules 14of evidence shall not apply and the competency of the evidence 15shall not thereby be deemed impaired. A verbatim record of the 16proceedings shall be made and the arbitrator shall arrange for 17the necessary recording service. Transcripts may be ordered at 18the expense of the party ordering them, but the transcripts 19shall not be necessary for a decision by the arbitration 20panel. The expense of the proceedings, including a fee for the 21chairman, shall be borne equally by each of the parties to the 22dispute. The delegates, if public officers or employees, shall 23continue on the payroll of the public employer without loss of 24pay. The hearing conducted by the arbitration panel may be 25adjourned from time to time, but unless otherwise agreed by 26the parties, shall be concluded within 30 days of the time of   SB1811- 12 -LRB104 07505 BDA 17549 b1its commencement. Majority actions and rulings shall 2constitute the actions and rulings of the arbitration panel. 3Arbitration proceedings under this Section shall not be 4interrupted or terminated by reason of any unfair labor 5practice charge filed by either party at any time.6    (e) The arbitration panel may administer oaths, require 7the attendance of witnesses, and the production of such books, 8papers, contracts, agreements and documents as may be deemed 9by it material to a just determination of the issues in 10dispute, and for such purpose may issue subpoenas. If any 11person refuses to obey a subpoena, or refuses to be sworn or to 12testify, or if any witness, party or attorney is guilty of any 13contempt while in attendance at any hearing, the arbitration 14panel may, or the attorney general if requested shall, invoke 15the aid of any circuit court within the jurisdiction in which 16the hearing is being held, which court shall issue an 17appropriate order. Any failure to obey the order may be 18punished by the court as contempt.19    (f) At any time before the rendering of an award, the 20chairman of the arbitration panel, if he is of the opinion that 21it would be useful or beneficial to do so, may remand the 22dispute to the parties for further collective bargaining for a 23period not to exceed 2 weeks. If the dispute is remanded for 24further collective bargaining the time provisions of this Act 25shall be extended for a time period equal to that of the 26remand. The chairman of the panel of arbitration shall notify   SB1811- 13 -LRB104 07505 BDA 17549 b1the Board of the remand.2    (g) At or before the conclusion of the hearing held 3pursuant to subsection (d), the arbitration panel shall 4identify the economic issues in dispute, and direct each of 5the parties to submit, within such time limit as the panel 6shall prescribe, to the arbitration panel and to each other 7its last offer of settlement on each economic issue. The 8determination of the arbitration panel as to the issues in 9dispute and as to which of these issues are economic shall be 10conclusive. The arbitration panel, within 30 days after the 11conclusion of the hearing, or such further additional periods 12to which the parties may agree, shall make written findings of 13fact and promulgate a written opinion and shall mail or 14otherwise deliver a true copy thereof to the parties and their 15representatives and to the Board. As to each economic issue, 16the arbitration panel shall adopt the last offer of settlement 17which, in the opinion of the arbitration panel, more nearly 18complies with the applicable factors prescribed in subsection 19(h). The findings, opinions and order as to all other issues 20shall be based upon the applicable factors prescribed in 21subsection (h).22    (h) Where there is no agreement between the parties, or 23where there is an agreement but the parties have begun 24negotiations or discussions looking to a new agreement or 25amendment of the existing agreement, and wage rates or other 26conditions of employment under the proposed new or amended   SB1811- 14 -LRB104 07505 BDA 17549 b1agreement are in dispute, the arbitration panel shall base its 2findings, opinions and order upon the following factors, as 3applicable:4        (1) The lawful authority of the employer.5        (2) Stipulations of the parties.6        (3) The interests and welfare of the public and the 7    financial ability of the unit of government to meet those 8    costs.9        (4) Comparison of the wages, hours and conditions of 10    employment of the employees involved in the arbitration 11    proceeding with the wages, hours and conditions of 12    employment of other employees performing similar services 13    and with other employees generally:14            (A) In public employment in comparable 15        communities.16            (B) In private employment in comparable 17        communities.18        (5) The average consumer prices for goods and 19    services, commonly known as the cost of living.20        (6) The overall compensation presently received by the 21    employees, including direct wage compensation, vacations, 22    holidays and other excused time, insurance and pensions, 23    medical and hospitalization benefits, the continuity and 24    stability of employment and all other benefits received.25        (7) Changes in any of the foregoing circumstances 26    during the pendency of the arbitration proceedings.  SB1811- 15 -LRB104 07505 BDA 17549 b1        (8) Such other factors, not confined to the foregoing, 2    which are normally or traditionally taken into 3    consideration in the determination of wages, hours and 4    conditions of employment through voluntary collective 5    bargaining, mediation, fact-finding, arbitration or 6    otherwise between the parties, in the public service or in 7    private employment.8    (i) In the case of peace officers, the arbitration 9decision shall be limited to wages, hours, and conditions of 10employment (which may include residency requirements in 11municipalities with a population under 100,000, but those 12residency requirements shall not allow residency outside of 13Illinois) and shall not include the following: i) residency 14requirements in municipalities with a population of at least 15100,000; ii) the type of equipment, other than uniforms, 16issued or used; iii) manning; iv) the total number of 17employees employed by the department; v) mutual aid and 18assistance agreements to other units of government; and vi) 19the criterion pursuant to which force, including deadly force, 20can be used; provided, nothing herein shall preclude an 21arbitration decision regarding equipment or manning levels if 22such decision is based on a finding that the equipment or 23manning considerations in a specific work assignment involve a 24serious risk to the safety of a peace officer beyond that which 25is inherent in the normal performance of police duties. 26Limitation of the terms of the arbitration decision pursuant   SB1811- 16 -LRB104 07505 BDA 17549 b1to this subsection shall not be construed to limit the factors 2upon which the decision may be based, as set forth in 3subsection (h).4    In the case of fire fighter, and fire department or fire 5district paramedic matters, the arbitration decision shall be 6limited to wages, hours, and conditions of employment 7(including manning and also including residency requirements 8in municipalities with a population under 1,000,000, but those 9residency requirements shall not allow residency outside of 10Illinois) and shall not include the following matters: i) 11residency requirements in municipalities with a population of 12at least 1,000,000; ii) the type of equipment (other than 13uniforms and fire fighter turnout gear) issued or used; iii) 14the total number of employees employed by the department; iv) 15mutual aid and assistance agreements to other units of 16government; and v) the criterion pursuant to which force, 17including deadly force, can be used; provided, however, 18nothing herein shall preclude an arbitration decision 19regarding equipment levels if such decision is based on a 20finding that the equipment considerations in a specific work 21assignment involve a serious risk to the safety of a fire 22fighter beyond that which is inherent in the normal 23performance of fire fighter duties. Limitation of the terms of 24the arbitration decision pursuant to this subsection shall not 25be construed to limit the facts upon which the decision may be 26based, as set forth in subsection (h).  SB1811- 17 -LRB104 07505 BDA 17549 b1    The changes to this subsection (i) made by Public Act 290-385 (relating to residency requirements) do not apply to 3persons who are employed by a combined department that 4performs both police and firefighting services; these persons 5shall be governed by the provisions of this subsection (i) 6relating to peace officers, as they existed before the 7amendment by Public Act 90-385.8    To preserve historical bargaining rights, this subsection 9shall not apply to any provision of a fire fighter collective 10bargaining agreement in effect and applicable on the effective 11date of this Act; provided, however, nothing herein shall 12preclude arbitration with respect to any such provision.13    (j) Arbitration procedures shall be deemed to be initiated 14by the filing of a letter requesting mediation as required 15under subsection (a) of this Section. The commencement of a 16new municipal fiscal year after the initiation of arbitration 17procedures under this Act, but before the arbitration 18decision, or its enforcement, shall not be deemed to render a 19dispute moot, or to otherwise impair the jurisdiction or 20authority of the arbitration panel or its decision. Increases 21in rates of compensation awarded by the arbitration panel may 22be effective only at the start of the fiscal year next 23commencing after the date of the arbitration award. If a new 24fiscal year has commenced either since the initiation of 25arbitration procedures under this Act or since any mutually 26agreed extension of the statutorily required period of   SB1811- 18 -LRB104 07505 BDA 17549 b1mediation under this Act by the parties to the labor dispute 2causing a delay in the initiation of arbitration, the 3foregoing limitations shall be inapplicable, and such awarded 4increases may be retroactive to the commencement of the fiscal 5year, any other statute or charter provisions to the contrary, 6notwithstanding. At any time the parties, by stipulation, may 7amend or modify an award of arbitration.8    (k) Orders of the arbitration panel shall be reviewable, 9upon appropriate petition by either the public employer or the 10exclusive bargaining representative, by the circuit court for 11the county in which the dispute arose or in which a majority of 12the affected employees reside, but only for reasons that the 13arbitration panel was without or exceeded its statutory 14authority; the order is arbitrary, or capricious; or the order 15was procured by fraud, collusion or other similar and unlawful 16means. Such petitions for review must be filed with the 17appropriate circuit court within 90 days following the 18issuance of the arbitration order. The pendency of such 19proceeding for review shall not automatically stay the order 20of the arbitration panel. The party against whom the final 21decision of any such court shall be adverse, if such court 22finds such appeal or petition to be frivolous, shall pay 23reasonable attorneys' fees and costs to the successful party 24as determined by said court in its discretion. If said court's 25decision affirms the award of money, such award, if 26retroactive, shall bear interest at the rate of 12 percent per   SB1811- 19 -LRB104 07505 BDA 17549 b1annum from the effective retroactive date.2    (l) During the pendency of proceedings before the 3arbitration panel, existing wages, hours, and other conditions 4of employment shall not be changed by action of either party 5without the consent of the other but a party may so consent 6without prejudice to his rights or position under this Act. 7The proceedings are deemed to be pending before the 8arbitration panel upon the initiation of arbitration 9procedures under this Act.10    (m) Security officers of public employers, and Peace 11Officers, Fire Fighters and fire department and fire 12protection district paramedics, covered by this Section may 13not withhold services, nor may public employers lock out or 14prevent such employees from performing services at any time.15    (n) All of the terms decided upon by the arbitration panel 16shall be included in an agreement to be submitted to the public 17employer's governing body for ratification and adoption by 18law, ordinance or the equivalent appropriate means.19    The governing body shall review each term decided by the 20arbitration panel. If the governing body fails to reject one 21or more terms of the arbitration panel's decision by a 3/5 vote 22of those duly elected and qualified members of the governing 23body, within 20 days of issuance, or in the case of 24firefighters employed by a state university, at the next 25regularly scheduled meeting of the governing body after 26issuance, such term or terms shall become a part of the   SB1811- 20 -LRB104 07505 BDA 17549 b1collective bargaining agreement of the parties. If the 2governing body affirmatively rejects one or more terms of the 3arbitration panel's decision, it must provide reasons for such 4rejection with respect to each term so rejected, within 20 5days of such rejection and the parties shall return to the 6arbitration panel for further proceedings and issuance of a 7supplemental decision with respect to the rejected terms. Any 8supplemental decision by an arbitration panel or other 9decision maker agreed to by the parties shall be submitted to 10the governing body for ratification and adoption in accordance 11with the procedures and voting requirements set forth in this 12Section. The voting requirements of this subsection shall 13apply to all disputes submitted to arbitration pursuant to 14this Section notwithstanding any contrary voting requirements 15contained in any existing collective bargaining agreement 16between the parties.17    (o) If the governing body of the employer votes to reject 18the panel's decision, the parties shall return to the panel 19within 30 days from the issuance of the reasons for rejection 20for further proceedings and issuance of a supplemental 21decision. All reasonable costs of such supplemental proceeding 22including the exclusive representative's reasonable attorney's 23fees, as established by the Board, shall be paid by the 24employer.25    (p) Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section the 26employer and exclusive representative may agree to submit   SB1811- 21 -LRB104 07505 BDA 17549 b1unresolved disputes concerning wages, hours, terms and 2conditions of employment to an alternative form of impasse 3resolution.4    The amendatory changes to this Section made by Public Act 5101-652 take effect July 1, 2022. 6(Source: P.A. 101-652, eff. 7-1-21; 102-28, eff. 6-25-21.)